Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.877

Technical colleges—Purchase of support services from school districts.

During the period from May 17, 1991, until September 1, 1991:

(1) The executive director of the state board for community and technical colleges, or the executive director's designee, may enter into contracts, or agreements for goods, services, and personnel, on behalf of the technical college, which are effective after September 1, 1991. The executive director, or the executive director's designee, may conduct business, including budget approval, relevant to the operation of the technical college in the period subsequent to September 1, 1991.

(2) Vocational-technical institute directors may conduct business relevant to the operation of the vocational-technical institutes. School boards and superintendents may not restrict or remove powers previously delegated to the vocational-technical institute directors during the 1990-91 school year.

(3) Technical colleges' boards of trustees appointed before September 1, 1991, shall serve in an advisory capacity to the vocational-technical institute director.

As of September 1, 1991, technical colleges may, by interlocal agreement, continue to purchase from the school districts, support services within mutually agreed upon categories at a cost not to exceed the indirect rate charged during the 1990-91 school year. No employee of a technical college may be discriminated against based on actions or opinions expressed on issues surrounding chapter 238, Laws of 1991. Any dispute related to issues contained in this section shall be resolved under *RCW 28B.50.302.

[ 1991 c 238 s 143.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.50.302 was decodified pursuant to 2015 c 55 s 119.